Illinois, session 104th, HB979.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Heroes Way Designation Program Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 127/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Heroes Way Designation Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-802, eff. 1-1-17.)